Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 212 of Title 22, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Immediately upon being arrested and booked into a city or county
jail facility, and except where physically impossible, no later than
forty-eight (48) hours after arrest, an arrested person has the
right to make at least three completed telephone calls at no expense
if the calls are completed to telephone numbers within the local
calling area, or at his or her own expense if outside the local
calling area, to the following:
1. An attorney of his or her choice or, if he or she has no
funds to pay for an attorney of his or her choice, the public
defender, or other attorney assigned by the court to assist
Req. No. 10501 Page 1

indi gents, whose telephone number shall be posted within the city or
county jail facility;
2. A bail bondsman; and
3. A relative or other person chosen by the arrested person.
The telephone calls shall be provided immediately upon request, or
as soon thereafter as practicable.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10501 GRS 12/18/24















Req. No. 10501 Page 2